Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.415.315

Classified instructional assistants—Training.

Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this purpose, the office of the superintendent of public instruction, in consultation with various groups representing school district classified employees, shall develop and offer a training strand through the summer institutes and the winter conference targeted to classified instructional assistants and designed to help them maximize their effectiveness in improving student achievement.

[ 2009 c 539 s 2; 2008 c 65 s 2.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2009 c 539: See note following RCW 28A.655.200.

Findings—Intent—2008 c 65: "The legislature finds that classified instructional assistants are key partners with classroom teachers in improving student achievement. Research on rigorous reading programs, including the reading first programs in our own state, proves that when instructional assistants are skilled, well-trained in a particular intervention, and positively supported by the classroom teacher or coach, they can have a significant impact on student reading attainment. The legislature further finds that school district practice provides sufficient evidence of the need for instructional assistants. Statewide, school districts relied on more than nineteen thousand classified instructional assistants, equal to nearly ten thousand full-time equivalent staff, during the 2006-07 school year. Therefore, the legislature intends to support instructional assistants by providing opportunities for high quality professional development to make them more effective partners in the classroom." [ 2008 c 65 s 1.]